Utah statutes.
53-3-304.   Licensing of impaired persons -- Medical review -- Restricted
license -- Procedures.
(1) (a)  If the division has reason to believe that an applicant for a license
is an impaired person, the division may require one or both of the following:
(i)  a physical examination of the applicant by a health care professional and
the submittal by the health care professional of a signed medical report
indicating the results of the physical examination;
(ii)  a follow-up medical review of the applicant by a health care
professional and completion of a medical report at intervals established by
the division under standards recommended by the board.
(b)  The format of the medical report required under Subsection (1)(a) shall
be devised by the division with the advice of the board and shall elicit the
necessary medical information to determine whether it would be a public safety
hazard to permit the applicant to drive a motor vehicle on the highways.
(2) (a)  The division may grant a restricted license to an impaired person who
is otherwise qualified to obtain a license.
(b)  The license continues in effect until its expiration date so long as the
licensee complies with the requirements set forth by the division.
(c)  The license renewal is subject to the conditions of this section.
(d)  Any physical, mental, or emotional impairment of the applicant that in
the opinion of the division does not affect the applicant's ability to
exercise reasonable and ordinary control at all times in driving a motor
vehicle upon the highway, does not prevent granting a license to the
applicant.
(3) (a)  If an examination is required under this section, the division is not
bound by the recommendation of the examining health care professional but
shall give fair consideration to the recommendation in acting upon the
application.  The criterion is whether upon all the evidence it is safe to
permit the applicant to drive a motor vehicle.
(b)  In deciding whether to grant or deny a license, the division may be
guided by the opinion of experts in the fields of diagnosing and treating
mental, physical, or emotional disabilities and may take into consideration
any other factors that bear on the issue of public safety.
(4)  Information provided under this section relating to physical, mental, or
emotional impairment is classified under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government
Records Access and Management Act.
